Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.045

Massage therapists—Procedures governing convicted prostitutes.

RCW 18.108.085 shall govern the issuance and revocation of licenses issued or applied for under chapter 18.108 RCW to or by persons convicted of violating RCW 9A.88.030, 9A.88.070, 9A.88.080, or 9A.88.090 or equivalent local ordinances.

[ 1995 c 353 s 3.]